Utah statutes.
32B-4-702.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1) (a)  For purposes of Section 32B-4-703, "exclusion" is as defined in 27 C.F.R. Sec. 8.51 through 8.54.

(b)  For purposes of Section 32B-4-704, "exclusion" is as defined in 27 C.F.R. Sec. 6.151 through 6.153.

(2) (a)  "Industry member" means:

(i)  an alcoholic product manufacturer;

(ii)  a producer;

(iii)  a supplier;

(iv)  an importer;

(v)  a wholesaler;

(vi)  a bottler;

(vii)  a warehouser and bottler; or

(viii)  for a person described in Subsections (2)(a)(i) through (vii), any of its:

(A)  affiliates;

(B)  subsidiaries;

(C)  officers;

(D)  directors;

(E)  partners;

(F)  agents;

(G)  employees; or

(H)  representatives.

(b)  "Industry member" does not include:

(i)  the commission;

(ii)  a commissioner;

(iii)  the director;

(iv)  the department; or

(v)  a department employee.

(3)  "Product" means an alcoholic product or item associated with an alcoholic product.

(4)  "Retailer" means:

(a)  the holder of a license or permit issued by the commission or by a local authority to allow the holder to engage in the sale of an alcoholic product to a patron whether for consumption on or off the premises; or

(b)  an agent, officer, director, shareholder, partner, or employee of a holder described in Subsection (4)(a).



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

